Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Judgments and Personal Representative

§ 15-4-401. Effect of adjudication for or against personal representative.

An adjudication rendered in any jurisdiction in favor of or against any personal representative of the estate is as binding on the local personal representative as if he were a party to the adjudication.